Nebraska, session 109, LB169.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-382, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-382 (1) The department shall prepare a tax expenditure report
describing (a) the basic provisions of the Nebraska tax laws, (b) the
actual or estimated revenue loss caused by the exemptions, deductions,
exclusions, deferrals, credits, and preferential rates in effect on July
1 of each year and allowed under Nebraska's tax structure and in the
property tax, (c) the actual or estimated revenue loss caused by failure
to impose sales and use tax on services purchased for nonbusiness use,
and (d) the elements which make up the tax base for state and local
income, including income, sales and use, property, and miscellaneous
taxes.
(2) The department shall review the major tax exemptions for which
state general funds are used to reduce the impact of revenue lost due to
a tax expenditure. The report shall indicate an estimate of the amount of
the reduction in revenue resulting from the operation of all tax
expenditures. The report shall list each tax expenditure relating to
sales and use tax under the following categories:
(a) Agriculture, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Agricultural machinery; agricultural chemicals; seeds
sold to commercial producers; water for irrigation and manufacturing;
commercial artificial insemination; mineral oil as dust suppressant;
animal specialty services and veterinary services performed on livestock
as defined in section 54-183 grooming; oxygen for use in aquaculture;
animal life whose products constitute food for human consumption; and
grains;
(b) Business across state lines, which shall include a separate
listing for the following items: Property shipped out-of-state;
fabrication labor for items to be shipped out-of-state; property to be
transported out-of-state; property purchased in other states to be used
in Nebraska; aircraft delivery to an out-of-state resident or business;
-2-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
state reciprocal agreements for industrial machinery; and property taxed
in another state;
(c) Common carrier and logistics, which shall include a separate
listing for the following items: Railroad rolling stock and repair parts
and services; common or contract carriers and repair parts and services;
common or contract carrier accessories; and common or contract carrier
safety equipment;
(d) Consumer goods, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Motor vehicles and motorboat trade-ins; merchandise
trade-ins; certain medical equipment and medicine; newspapers;
laundromats; telefloral deliveries; motor vehicle discounts for the
disabled; and political campaign fundraisers;
(e) Energy, which shall include a separate listing for the following
items: Motor fuels; energy used in industry; energy used in agriculture;
aviation fuel; and minerals, oil, and gas severed from real property;
(f) Food, which shall include a separate listing for the following
items: Food for home consumption; Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program; school lunches; meals sold by hospitals; meals sold by
institutions at a flat rate; food for the elderly, handicapped, and
Supplemental Security Income recipients; and meals sold by churches;
(g) General business, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Component and ingredient parts; manufacturing machinery;
containers; film rentals; molds and dies; syndicated programming;
intercompany sales; intercompany leases; sale of a business or farm
machinery; and transfer of property in a change of business ownership;
(h) Lodging and shelter, which shall include a separate listing for
the following item: Room rentals by certain institutions;
(i) Miscellaneous, which shall include a separate listing for the
following items: Cash discounts and coupons; separately stated finance
charges; casual sales; lease-to-purchase agreements; and separately
stated taxes;
-3-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
(j) Nonprofits, governments, and exempt entities, which shall
include a separate listing for the following items: Purchases by
political subdivisions of the state; purchases by churches and nonprofit
colleges and medical facilities; purchasing agents for public real estate
construction improvements; contractor as purchasing agent for public
agencies; Nebraska lottery; admissions to school events; sales on Native
American Indian reservations; school-supporting fundraisers; fine art
purchases by a museum; purchases by the Nebraska State Fair Board;
purchases by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority and licensees of
the State Racing and Gaming Commission; purchases by the United States
Government; public records; and sales by religious organizations;
(k) Recent sales tax expenditures, which shall include a separate
listing for each sales tax expenditure created by statute or rule and
regulation after July 19, 2012;
(l) Services purchased for nonbusiness use, which shall include a
separate listing for each such service, including, but not limited to,
the following items: Motor vehicle cleaning, maintenance, and repair
services; cleaning and repair of clothing; cleaning, maintenance, and
repair of other tangible personal property; maintenance, painting, and
repair of real property; entertainment admissions; the cutting of hair
personal care services; lawn care, gardening, and landscaping services;
pet-related services; storage and moving services; household utilities;
other personal services; taxi, limousine, and other transportation
services; legal services; accounting services; other professional
services; and other real estate services; and
(m) Telecommunications, which shall include a separate listing for
the following items: Telecommunications access charges; prepaid calling
arrangements; conference bridging services; and nonvoice data services.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in the Tax
Expenditure Reporting Act shall cause the valuation or assessment of any
property exempt from taxation on the basis of its use exclusively for
-4-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
religious, educational, or charitable purposes.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2701.16, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2701.16 (1) Gross receipts means the total amount of the sale or
lease or rental price, as the case may be, of the retail sales of
retailers.
(2) Gross receipts of every person engaged as a public utility
specified in this subsection, as a community antenna television service
operator, or as a satellite service operator or any person involved in
connecting and installing services defined in subdivision (2)(a), (b), or
(d) of this section means:
(a)(i) In the furnishing of telephone communication service, other
than mobile telecommunications service as described in section
77-2703.04, the gross income received from furnishing ancillary
services , except for conference bridging services, and intrastate and
interstate telecommunications services, except for value-added, nonvoice
data service.
(ii) In the furnishing of mobile telecommunications service as
described in section 77-2703.04, the gross income received from
furnishing mobile telecommunications service that originates and
terminates in the same state to a customer with a place of primary use in
Nebraska;
(b) In the furnishing of telegraph service, the gross income
received from the furnishing of intrastate and interstate telegraph
services;
(c)(i) In the furnishing of gas, sewer, water, and electricity
service, other than electricity service to a customer-generator as
defined in section 70-2002, the gross income received from the furnishing
of such services upon billings or statements rendered to consumers for
such utility services.
(ii) In the furnishing of electricity service to a customer-
-5-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
generator as defined in section 70-2002, the net energy use upon billings
or statements rendered to customer-generators for such electricity
service;
(d) In the furnishing of community antenna television service or
satellite service, the gross income received from the furnishing of such
community antenna television service as regulated under sections 18-2201
to 18-2205 or 23-383 to 23-388 or satellite service; and
(e) The gross income received from the provision, installation,
construction, servicing, or removal of property used in conjunction with
the furnishing, installing, or connecting of any public utility services
specified in subdivision (2)(a) or (b) of this section or community
antenna television service or satellite service specified in subdivision
(2)(d) of this section, except when acting as a subcontractor for a
public utility, this subdivision does not apply to the gross income
received by a contractor electing to be treated as a consumer of building
materials under subdivision (2) or (3) of section 77-2701.10 for any such
services performed on the customer's side of the utility demarcation
point. This subdivision also does not apply to:
(i) The gross income received by a political subdivision of the
state, an electric cooperative, or an electric membership association for
the lease or use of, or by a contractor for the construction of or
services provided on, electric generation, transmission, distribution, or
street lighting structures or facilities owned by a political subdivision
of the state, an electric cooperative, or an electric membership
association; or
(ii) The gross income received for the lease or use of towers or
other structures primarily used in conjunction with the furnishing of (A)
Internet access services, (B) agricultural global positioning system
locating services, or (C) over-the-air radio and television broadcasting
licensed by the Federal Communications Commission, including antennas and
studio transmitter link systems. For purposes of this subdivision, studio
-6-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
transmitter link system means a system which serves as a conduit to
deliver audio from its origin in a studio to a broadcast transmitter.
(3) Gross receipts of every person engaged in selling, leasing, or
otherwise providing intellectual or entertainment property means:
(a) In the furnishing of computer software, the gross income
received, including the charges for coding, punching, or otherwise
producing any computer software and the charges for the tapes, disks,
punched cards, or other properties furnished by the seller; and
(b) In the furnishing of videotapes, movie film, satellite
programming, satellite programming service, and satellite television
signal descrambling or decoding devices, the gross income received from
the license, franchise, or other method establishing the charge.
(4) Gross receipts for providing a service means:
(a) The gross income received for building cleaning and maintenance,
pest control, and security;
(b) The gross income received for motor vehicle washing, waxing,
towing, and painting;
(c) The gross income received for computer software training;
(d) The gross income received for installing and applying tangible
personal property if the sale of the property is subject to tax. If any
or all of the charge for installation is free to the customer and is paid
by a third-party service provider to the installer, any tax due on that
part of the activation commission, finder's fee, installation charge, or
similar payment made by the third-party service provider shall be paid
and remitted by the third-party service provider;
(e) The gross income received for services of recreational vehicle
parks;
(f) The gross income received for labor for repair or maintenance
services performed with regard to tangible personal property the sale of
which would be subject to sales and use taxes, excluding motor vehicles,
except as otherwise provided in section 77-2704.26 or 77-2704.50;
-7-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
(g) The gross income received for animal specialty services and
except (i) veterinary services, except for animal (ii) specialty services
or veterinary services performed on livestock as defined in section
54-183; , and (iii) animal grooming performed by a licensed veterinarian
or a licensed veterinary technician in conjunction with medical
treatment; and
(h) The gross income received for detective services; .
(i) The gross income received for providing chartered flights;
(j) The gross income received for the cleaning of clothing,
excluding any amounts exempt pursuant to section 77-2704.14;
(k) The gross income received for dating services;
(l) The gross income received for hair care and hair removal
services, except for the cutting of hair;
(m) The gross income received for interior design and decorating
services;
(n) The gross income received for lobbying services;
(o) The gross income received for local passenger transportation by
chartered road vehicles, including limousines and similar luxury
vehicles;
(p) The gross income received for marketing and telemarketing
services;
(q) The gross income received for massage services;
(r) The gross income received for nail care services;
(s) The gross income received for personal instruction services for
dance, golf, or tennis;
(t) The gross income received for sightseeing services by ground
vehicles;
(u) The gross income received for skin care services;
(v) The gross income received for swimming pool cleaning and
maintenance services;
(w) The gross income received for tattoo and body modification
-8-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
services;
(x) The gross income received for telefloral delivery services,
defined as amounts received by florists in this state who make deliveries
in this state pursuant to instructions received from florists in other
states;
(y) The gross income received for travel agency services; and
(z) The gross income received for weight loss services.
(5) Gross receipts includes the sale of admissions. When an
admission to an activity or a membership constituting an admission is
combined with the solicitation of a contribution, the portion or the
amount charged representing the fair market price of the admission shall
be considered a retail sale subject to the tax imposed by section
77-2703. The organization conducting the activity shall determine the
amount properly attributable to the purchase of the privilege, benefit,
or other consideration in advance, and such amount shall be clearly
indicated on any ticket, receipt, or other evidence issued in connection
with the payment.
(6) Gross receipts includes the sale of live plants incorporated
into real estate except when such incorporation is incidental to the
transfer of an improvement upon real estate or the real estate.
(7) Gross receipts includes the sale of any building materials
annexed to real estate by a person electing to be taxed as a retailer
pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 77-2701.10.
(8) Gross receipts includes the sale of and recharge of prepaid
calling service and prepaid wireless calling service.
(9) Gross receipts includes the retail sale of digital audio works,
digital audiovisual works, digital codes, and digital books delivered
electronically if the products are taxable when delivered on tangible
storage media. A sale includes the transfer of a permanent right of use,
the transfer of a right of use that terminates on some condition, and the
transfer of a right of use conditioned upon the receipt of continued
-9-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
payments.
(10) Gross receipts includes any receipts from sales of tangible
personal property made over a multivendor marketplace platform that acts
as the intermediary by facilitating sales between a seller and the
purchaser and that, either directly or indirectly through agreements or
arrangements with third parties, collects payment from the purchaser and
transmits payment to the seller.
(11) Gross receipts does not include:
(a) The amount of any rebate granted by a motor vehicle or motorboat
manufacturer or dealer at the time of sale of the motor vehicle or
motorboat, which rebate functions as a discount from the sales price of
the motor vehicle or motorboat; or
(b) The price of property or services returned or rejected by
customers when the full sales price is refunded either in cash or credit.
Sec. 3. Section 77-3005, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3005 (1) The occupation tax levied and imposed by the Mechanical
Amusement Device Tax Act shall be in addition to any and all taxes or
fees, of any form whatsoever, now imposed by the State of Nebraska upon
the business of operating or distributing mechanical amusement devices,
including sales and use tax on the gross receipts from the operation of
mechanical amusement devices except that payment of the tax and license
fees due and owing on or before the licensing date of each year shall
exempt any such mechanical amusement device from the application of the
sales tax which would or could otherwise be imposed under the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967. Nonpayment of the taxes or fees due and owing on or
before the licensing date of each year shall render the exemption
provided by this section inapplicable, and the particular mechanical
amusement devices shall then be subject to all the provisions of the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, including the penalty provisions pertaining
to the distributor or operator of such mechanical amusement devices.
-10-

LB169 LB169
2025 2025
(2) No political subdivision of the State of Nebraska shall levy or
impose any tax on mechanical amusement devices in addition to the taxes
imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act, except for local
option sales and use taxes.
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 5. Original sections 77-382, 77-2701.16, and 77-3005, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 6. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
77-2704.53, 77-2704.56, 77-2704.65, and 77-2704.67, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska.
-11-